hunspell/hr_HR/hr_HR.aff
FLAG long
SFX UK Y      12
SFX UK i      a          i
SFX UK i      u          i
SFX UK i      im         i
SFX UK i      ih         i
SFX UK i      ima        i
SFX UK i      e          i
SFX UK i      oj         i
SFX UK i      om         i
SFX UK i      eg         i
SFX UK i      ega        i
SFX UK i      em         i
SFX UK i      emu        i

SFX UJ Y      45
SFX UJ 0      ov         [^čćšjž]
SFX UJ 0      ova        [^čćšjž]
SFX UJ 0      ovu        [^čćšjž]
SFX UJ 0      ovim       [^čćšjž]
SFX UJ 0      ovi        [^čćšjž]
SFX UJ 0      ovih       [^čćšjž]
SFX UJ 0      ovima      [^čćšjž]
SFX UJ 0      ove        [^čćšjž]
SFX UJ 0      ovo        [^čćšjž]
SFX UJ 0      ovoj       [^čćšjž]
SFX UJ 0      ovom       [^čćšjž]
SFX UJ 0      ovog       [^čćšjž]
SFX UJ 0      ovoga      [^čćšjž]
SFX UJ 0      ovome      [^čćšjž]
SFX UJ 0      ovomu      [^čćšjž]
SFX UJ 0      ev         [čćšjž]
SFX UJ 0      eva        [čćšjž]
SFX UJ 0      evu        [čćšjž]
SFX UJ 0      evim       [čćšjž]
SFX UJ 0      evi        [čćšjž]
SFX UJ 0      evih       [čćšjž]
SFX UJ 0      evima      [čćšjž]
SFX UJ 0      eve        [čćšjž]
SFX UJ 0      evo        [čćšjž]
SFX UJ 0      evoj       [čćšjž]
SFX UJ 0      evom       [čćšjž]
SFX UJ 0      evog       [čćšjž]
SFX UJ 0      evoga      [čćšjž]
SFX UJ 0      evome      [čćšjž]
SFX UJ 0      evomu      [čćšjž]
SFX UJ 0      ev         ar
SFX UJ 0      eva        ar
SFX UJ 0      evu        ar
SFX UJ 0      evim       ar
SFX UJ 0      evi        ar
SFX UJ 0      evih       ar
SFX UJ 0      evima      ar
SFX UJ 0      eve        ar
SFX UJ 0      evo        ar
SFX UJ 0      evoj       ar
SFX UJ 0      evom       ar
SFX UJ 0      evog       ar
SFX UJ 0      evoga      ar
SFX UJ 0      evome      ar
SFX UJ 0      evomu      ar

SFX UI Y      15
SFX UI a      in         a
SFX UI a      ina        a
SFX UI a      inu        a
SFX UI a      ini        a
SFX UI a      inim       a
SFX UI a      inih       a
SFX UI a      inima      a
SFX UI a      ine        a
SFX UI a      ino        a
SFX UI a      inoj       a
SFX UI a      inom       a
SFX UI a      inog       a
SFX UI a      inoga      a
SFX UI a      inome      a
SFX UI a      inomu      a

SFX UH Y      15
SFX UH ca     čin        ca
SFX UH ca     čina       ca
SFX UH ca     činu       ca
SFX UH ca     čini       ca
SFX UH ca     činim      ca
SFX UH ca     činih      ca
SFX UH ca     činima     ca
SFX UH ca     čine       ca
SFX UH ca     čino       ca
SFX UH ca     činoj      ca
SFX UH ca     činom      ca
SFX UH ca     činog      ca
SFX UH ca     činoga     ca
SFX UH ca     činome     ca
SFX UH ca     činomu     ca

SFX UG Y      60
SFX UG ac     čev        ac
SFX UG ac     čeva       ac
SFX UG ac     čevu       ac
SFX UG ac     čevim      ac
SFX UG ac     čevi       ac
SFX UG ac     čevih      ac
SFX UG ac     čevima     ac
SFX UG ac     čeve       ac
SFX UG ac     čevo       ac
SFX UG ac     čevoj      ac
SFX UG ac     čevom      ac
SFX UG ac     čevog      ac
SFX UG ac     čevoga     ac
SFX UG ac     čevome     ac
SFX UG ac     čevomu     ac
SFX UG ak     kov        ak
SFX UG ak     kova       ak
SFX UG ak     kovu       ak
SFX UG ak     kovim      ak
SFX UG ak     kovi       ak
SFX UG ak     kovih      ak
SFX UG ak     kovima     ak
SFX UG ak     kove       ak
SFX UG ak     kovo       ak
SFX UG ak     kovoj      ak
SFX UG ak     kovom      ak
SFX UG ak     kovog      ak
SFX UG ak     kovoga     ak
SFX UG ak     kovome     ak
SFX UG ak     kovomu     ak
SFX UG alj    ljev       alj
SFX UG alj    ljeva      alj
SFX UG alj    ljevu      alj
SFX UG alj    ljevim     alj
SFX UG alj    ljevi      alj
SFX UG alj    ljevih     alj
SFX UG alj    ljevima    alj
SFX UG alj    ljeve      alj
SFX UG alj    ljevo      alj
SFX UG alj    ljevoj     alj
SFX UG alj    ljevom     alj
SFX UG alj    ljevog     alj
SFX UG alj    ljevoga    alj
SFX UG alj    ljevome    alj
SFX UG alj    ljevomu    alj
SFX UG ar     rov        ar
SFX UG ar     rova       ar
SFX UG ar     rovu       ar
SFX UG ar     rovim      ar
SFX UG ar     rovi       ar
SFX UG ar     rovih      ar
SFX UG ar     rovima     ar
SFX UG ar     rove       ar
SFX UG ar     rovo       ar
SFX UG ar     rovoj      ar
SFX UG ar     rovom      ar
SFX UG ar     rovog      ar
SFX UG ar     rovoga     ar
SFX UG ar     rovome     ar
SFX UG ar     rovomu     ar

SFX UF Y      30
SFX UF lac    očev       lac
SFX UF lac    očeva      lac
SFX UF lac    očevu      lac
SFX UF lac    očevim     lac
SFX UF lac    očevi      lac
SFX UF lac    očevih     lac
SFX UF lac    očevima    lac
SFX UF lac    očeve      lac
SFX UF lac    očevo      lac
SFX UF lac    očevoj     lac
SFX UF lac    očevom     lac
SFX UF lac    očevog     lac
SFX UF lac    očevoga    lac
SFX UF lac    očevome    lac
SFX UF lac    očevomu    lac
SFX UF 0      v          [oe]
SFX UF 0      va         [oe]
SFX UF 0      ve         [oe]
SFX UF 0      vi         [oe]
SFX UF 0      vo         [oe]
SFX UF 0      vu         [oe]
SFX UF 0      vog        [oe]
SFX UF 0      voga       [oe]
SFX UF 0      voj        [oe]
SFX UF 0      vom        [oe]
SFX UF 0      vome       [oe]
SFX UF 0      vomu       [oe]
SFX UF 0      vim        [oe]
SFX UF 0      vima       [oe]
SFX UF 0      vih        [oe]

SFX UE Y      19
SFX UE ki     ak         ki
SFX UE ni     an         ni
SFX UE ri     ar         ri
SFX UE vi     av         vi
SFX UE lji    alj        lji
SFX UE an     na         an
SFX UE an     nu         an
SFX UE an     nim        an
SFX UE an     nih        an
SFX UE an     nima       an
SFX UE an     ne         an
SFX UE an     no         an
SFX UE an     noj        an
SFX UE an     nom        an
SFX UE an     nog        an
SFX UE an     noga       an
SFX UE an     nome       an
SFX UE an     nomu       an
SFX UE an     ni         an

SFX UD Y      19
SFX UD ti     n          ti
SFX UD ti     na         ti
SFX UD ti     nu         ti
SFX UD ti     ni         ti
SFX UD ti     nim        ti
SFX UD ti     nih        ti
SFX UD ti     nima       ti
SFX UD ti     ne         ti
SFX UD ti     no         ti
SFX UD ti     noj        ti
SFX UD ti     nom        ti
SFX UD ti     nog        ti
SFX UD ti     noga       ti
SFX UD ti     nome       ti
SFX UD ti     nomu       ti
SFX UD ti     nost       ti
SFX UD ti     nosti      ti
SFX UD ti     nostima    ti
SFX UD ti     nošću      ti

SFX UC Y      15
SFX UC ti     n          ti
SFX UC ti     na         ti
SFX UC ti     nu         ti
SFX UC ti     ni         ti
SFX UC ti     nim        ti
SFX UC ti     nih        ti
SFX UC ti     nima       ti
SFX UC ti     ne         ti
SFX UC ti     no         ti
SFX UC ti     noj        ti
SFX UC ti     nom        ti
SFX UC ti     nog        ti
SFX UC ti     noga       ti
SFX UC ti     nome       ti
SFX UC ti     nomu       ti

PFX UB Y      1
PFX UB 0      naj        .

AF XZURUD	# 33
AF XZURUC	# 34
AF XYURUD	# 45
AF XYURUC	# 47
AF XOURUC	# 86
AF XMURUC	# 96
AF WZURUD	# 114
AF WZUD	# 119
AF WZUC	# 120
AF WYUD	# 126
AF WBUD	# 174
AF WBUC	# 175
AF VOUJ	# 217
AF VOUJUA	# 221
AF VOUJTQ	# 222
AF VOUJTQUA	# 223
AF VOUJTPUA	# 227
AF VOUJTOUA	# 229
AF VOUJTOTMUA	# 231
AF VOUF	# 237
AF VNUF	# 246
AF VMUG	# 256
AF VMUGUA	# 257
AF VLUF	# 262
AF VLUFUA	# 263
AF VKUJUA	# 268
AF VEUF	# 303
AF UUUF	# 336
AF UOUE	# 347
AF UMUB	# 355
AF UKUB	# 358
AF UE	# 359
AF TZUI	# 362
AF TZUIUA	# 363
AF TZUH	# 364
AF TZTTUI	# 369
AF TWUI	# 379
AF TVUI	# 381
AF TRUH	# 389
