hunspell/hr_HR/hr_HR.dic
anemičar/229
antiklerikalac/256
Apolo/303
Arapkinja/362
aromatični/347
atlas/217
bankrotirati/33
barba/362
barica/364
benediktinac/256
berkelij/268
bezdušniji/355
bezočni/347
bludilac/262
bogoubojica/389
bravac/256
brbljavka/369
briketar/221
britkiji/355
bubica/364
čelist/222
Čifutkinja/362
članica/389
čovječuljak/257
čudni/347
Dario/303
demaskirati/34
demonizirati/33
demotivirajući/358
diskriminirati/33
dječačić/217
djelilac/263
dražeći/358
dublji/355
duga/362
duševni/347
dvodihalica/364
dvospolac/256
Egidije/303
etiketirati/33
fizičar/229
fluktualan/359
fućkati/34
Galileo/303
Geja/362
gestapovac/257
gljivica/364
gori/358
gringo/237
hadezeovac/256
historičar/229
homogenizirati/33
horda/362
hrapaviji/355
Hugo/303
impozantni/347
ionizirajući/358
iskovati/126
ismijati/175
isusovac/256
izgurivati/47
izlokati/174
izmičući/358
izvršilac/262
jednokratni/347
jelica/389
Julija/362
kaluđer/223
kardiotahometar/257
klimaviji/355
kočeći/358
kompromitirati/33
komuna/362
Konfucije/303
kontaktirati/34
kooperativni/347
kozmopolit/221
kraljevac/256
kućedomaćica/389
larva/362
Libanonac/256
lobirati/33
lutalica/364
Malijka/369
maneken/229
manični/347
marginalac/256
metvica/364
miliji/355
Mirko/303
moljac/256
mudronja/362
nadražujući/358
nadrealni/347
nadrogirati/119
nalagati/86
napuhanko/246
nasljednik/227
natapaniji/355
neborac/257
neimenovati/45
neizravniji/355
nekompletni/347
nepreporniji/355
neprijatni/347
neumorni/347
nevaljalica/364
objedovati/47
očevidniji/355
odmakli/358
okaljati/114
okopavati/34
opći/358
ornamentalni/347
osa/362
oslobodilac/263
osnovati/126
otkapati/34
otpremnik/227
parajući/358
perverzniji/355
pišteči/358
pitomac/257
pjevica/364
plazma/362
počašćivati/47
podupirući/358
pokopati/119
poltron/229
poludelirični/347
poopćavati/34
poznavalac/262
pozobati/120
praskajući/358
precizniji/355
preoptimistični/347
previjati/33
pripicati/86
pristalica/364
prokurator/223
prolazeći/358
prosilac/262
prostitutka/381
protjerati/119
provincijalni/347
psihijatar/257
radišniji/355
raspuštenica/389
razarajući/358
razaznavati/47
rezuckati/33
romantičar/229
ružmarinko/336
sakralni/347
Salvadorka/369
samorazarajući/358
samozatajniji/355
sinovica/389
smijući/358
spahija/363
Spartanac/256
srditiji/355
sricati/86
staričica/389
stipendist/222
stradalac/262
šljuka/379
tekstualizacija/364
terorizirati/33
Tibetanac/256
tješitelj/223
totalitarni/347
tragičniji/355
truleći/358
tupavko/246
udvorica/364
umakati/86
uzdržaniji/355
vinar/231
vladalac/263
Vojvođanka/369
zabravljivati/47
zagrizati/33
zatvoreniji/355
znalac/257
znanica/389
zureći/358
žderati/96
